Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6265.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "data center reporting act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Commission" means the Michigan public service commission created in section 1 of 1939 PA 3, MCL 460.1. (b) "Data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. (c) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. Sec. 5. (1) Beginning March 1, 2028, and by March 1 of each year thereafter, the owner or operator of a data center shall file a written report with the commission that includes all of the following information for the immediately preceding calendar year: (a) The total water consumption of the data center. (b) The sources of the water consumed by the data center. (c) The total electricity consumption of the data center. (d) The percentage of the total electricity consumption of the data center that was derived from renewable sources. (2) If the commission determines that a written report filed under subsection (1) is inaccurate or incomplete, the commission shall notify the owner or operator in writing or make notice electronically available, describing the deficiency and requesting the corrected or additional information. The owner or operator shall file a corrected written report with the commission not later than 30 days after the owner or operator receives notice from the commission under this subsection. Sec. 7. A person that violates section 5 is subject to a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00 for each day the violation occurs or the failure to comply continues. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the civil fine. A civil fine collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund. Sec. 9. The commission may promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6135. (b) House Bill No. 6136. (c) House Bill No. 6137. (d) House Bill No. 6138. (e) House Bill No. 6139. (f) House Bill No. 6140. (g) House Bill No. 6141. (h) House Bill No. 6142.